src/morphology/affixes/adjectives-L2.lexc
LEXICON LAIKI0     !!= * __@CODE@__  Directing adjectives ...
 DEVNVCASE ;      ! ... to bisyllabic nominal declension
!+Use/-Spell: VUOHTA ;         ! ... to A > N -vuohta derivation  L2



LEXICON JOHTOLAT
! +Der4+Der/geahtes+A+Attr:»#geahtes K ; !This is not right
 @C.NeedNoun@ HEANDARAT-COMM ;
! The flag is there because verbs are derived via +Der/us suffix to
! JOHTOLAT, and then pick up their +N tag in HEANDARAT-COMM, but not
! via +Der/geahtes.

LEXICON JOHTOLAT0 !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Sg+Nom:%> K ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%> R ;			! test this
 +Cmp/SgGen:%> R ;
! +Sg+Nom@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@:%>X7@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@ R ;   ! removed since cons-final.
! +Sg+Nom@U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@:%>@U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@ R ;   ! removed since cons-final.
! +Sg+Gen:%> K ;
! +Sg+Acc:%> K ;
! This must be a typo!


LEXICON JOHTOLAHKA- !!= * __@CODE@__
! +Sg+Nom:%> Px3V ;
 +Ess:n K ;
 +Ess:n%> PxC ;
 :X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
 :X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
! +Err/Orth: GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +Sg+Gen:X4 K ;
 +Sg+Acc:X4 K ;
 +Cmp/SgGen+Err/Orth:X4 R ; ! !Note! Same entry under GOADE-
 +Sg+Gen:X4 Px3V ;
 +Sg+Acc:X4 Px3V ;
 +Sg+Loc:X4s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Loc:X4st%> PxC ;
 +Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:X4stt%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Nom:X4t K ;
 +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:X4k K ;
 +Err/Orth:X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
 +Err/Orth:X8 GOADE- ; !  ! Ditto (?)

LEXICON ISSORASSA2-
 +Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: PxV ; ! ! tentative.
 +Ess:n K ;
 +Ess+Err/Orth:n%> PxC ; ! ! tentative, check.
 +Use/NG:X4 BU/MUS ;  
 HEAPMIOBL ;


LEXICON ISSORASSA- !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: PxV ; ! ! tentative.
 +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:t K ;
 +Ess:n K ;
 +Ess+Err/Orth:n%> PxC ; ! ! tentative, check.
 :X4 BU/MUS ;  
 HEAPMIOBL ;


LEXICON EABBO/EAMOS !!= * __@CODE@__
 ADVC ;
 EABBO/EAMOS_CONT ;
 
LEXICON EABBO/EAMOS_NVD !!= * __@CODE@__
 ADVC ;
 EABBO/EAMOS_CONT_NVD ;


LEXICON EABBO/EAMOS_CONT !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Comp+Dial/%-GG:at SHORTCOMP_PREDNVD ; ! 
 +Comp+Use/NG:it SHORTCOMP_NVD ; ! !In use in Gg, not in Kj. Not generated
 +Comp+Dial/%-KJ:et SHORTCOMP_PREDNVD ;
 +Comp+Use/NG:ut SHORTCOMP_NVD ; ! !In use in Kj, not in Gg. Not generated
 +Comp+Err/Orth+Dial/%-KJ:eabbu EABBU ;  ! Parallel form. Not standard. 
 +Comp+Dial/%-KJ:eabbo EABBU ;  ! Parallel form. Standard. 
 +Comp+Dial/%-GG:ab'bo EABBU ;  ! Parallel form. Standard.  
 +Comp+Err/Orth+Dial/%-GG+Dial/%-KJ:eb'bo EABBU ; 
 +Comp+Err/Orth+Dial/%-GG:ab'bu EABBU ;  ! Parallel form. Not standard. 
 +Superl+Dial/%-GG:amos EAMOS ; !  
 +Superl+Err/Orth+Dial/%-GG+Dial/%-KJ:emos EAMOS ; !  
 +Superl+Dial/%-KJ:eapmo7s EAMOS ; ! 
 +Superl+Err/Orth:eapmus EAMOS ;

LEXICON EABBO/EAMOS_CONT_NVD !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Comp+Dial/%-GG:at SHORTCOMP_NVD ; ! 
 +Comp+Use/NG:it SHORTCOMP_NVD ; ! !In use in Gg, not in Kj. Not generated
 +Comp+Dial/%-KJ:et SHORTCOMP_NVD ;
 +Comp+Use/NG:ut SHORTCOMP_NVD ; ! !In use in Kj, not in Gg. Not generated
 +Comp+Err/Orth+Dial/%-KJ:eabbu EABBU ;  ! Parallel form. Not standard. 
 +Comp+Dial/%-KJ:eabbo EABBU_NVD ;  ! Parallel form. Standard. 
 +Comp+Dial/%-GG:ab'bo EABBU_NVD ;  ! Parallel form. Standard.  
 +Comp+Err/Orth+Dial/%-GG:ab'bu EABBU_NVD ;  ! Parallel form. Not standard. 
 +Superl+Dial/%-GG:amos EAMOS_NVD ; ! 
 +Superl+Dial/%-KJ:eapmo7s EAMOS_NVD ; ! 
 +Superl+Err/Orth:eapmus EAMOS_NVD ;


LEXICON EAMOS_NVD !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Sg+Nom+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%>X4 K ;
 +Ess:%>X4in K ;
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:%>X2 PxC ;
 +Sg+Gen:%>X2a K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%>X2 K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:%>X2 PxC ;
 +Sg+Acc:%>X2a K ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%>X2 K ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:%>X2 PxC ;
 +Pl+Nom+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%>X2at K ;
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:%>X2asa%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Nom+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:%>X2ijddá%> Px1V ;
 +Sg+Ill:%>X2ij K ;
 +Sg+Loc:%>X2is K ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>X2in K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Com:%>X2ijn K ;
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:%>X2ijnna K ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>X2ijd K ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:%>X2ijd R ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>X2ijd K ;
 +Pl+Ill:%>X2ijdda K ;
 +Pl+Loc:%>X2ijn K ;
 +Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:%>X2ijnna K ;
 +Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>X2ijs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Pl+Com:%>X2ijgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh:%>X2ij%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:%>X2istti%> PxV ;
 +Sg+Com+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:%>X2ijnni%> PxV ;
! +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:%>X2ijddi%> PxV ; !^P^ !MARG
 +Pl+Gen+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:%>X2ijddi%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Acc+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:%>X2ijddi%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Ill+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:%>X2ijddás%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Loc+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:%>X2ijnni%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Com+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:%>X2ijddi%> PxPlComV1 ;
 :%>X2 ADVC ;
 +Attr+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%>X4 K ; ! Attributive superaltives



LEXICON EABBO/EAMOS_CONT-contracted  !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Comp:at SHORTCOMP ; !  
! +Comp+Use/NG:it SHORTCOMP ; !  !In use in Gg, not in Kj. Not generated
! +Comp+Use/NG:et SHORTCOMP ; !   
 +Comp+Use/NG:ut SHORTCOMP_NVD ; !  !In use in Kj, not in Gg. Not generated
! +Comp+Err/Orth+Use/NG:eabbu EABBU ;  ! Parallel form. Not standard. 
! +Comp+Use/NG:eabbo EABBU ;  ! Parallel form. Standard. 
 +Comp:ab'bo EABBU ;  ! Parallel form. Standard.  ! OBS
 +Comp+Err/Orth:ab'bu EABBU ;  ! Parallel form. Not standard. 
 +Superl:amos EAMOS ; ! 
! +Superl+Use/NG:eapmo7s EAMOS ;
! +Superl+Err/Orth:eapmus EAMOS ;

LEXICON SHORTCOMP !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Sg+Nom:%> K ; ! 
 ATTRCONT ;

LEXICON SHORTCOMP_NVD !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Sg+Nom+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%> K ; ! 
 +Attr+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%> K ;  ! Comp are also Attr.
 +Err/Orth: Rreal ;    

LEXICON SHORTCOMP_PREDNVD !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Sg+Nom+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%> K ; ! 
 ATTRCONT ;


LEXICON EABBU !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom:»X6ž K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Ess:»X6žin K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:»X6ž%> PxC ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen:»X6ža K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:»X6ž K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:»X6ž%> PxC ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc:»X6ža K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:»X6ž K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:»X6ž%> PxC ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:»X6žat K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:»X6žasa%> PxV ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:»X6žijddá%> Px1V ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill:»X6žij K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc:»X6žis K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:»X6žin K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com:»X6žijn K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth:»X6žijnna K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen:»X6žijd K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/PlGen:»X6žijd R ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc:»X6žijd K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill:»X6žijdda K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc:»X6žijn K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:»X6žijnna K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:»X6žijs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com:»X6žijgujn K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com/Sh:»X6žij%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:»X6žistti%> PxV ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:»X6žijnni%> PxV ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:»X6žijddi%> PxV ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:»X6žijddi%> PxV ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:»X6žijddás%> PxC ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:»X6žijnni%> PxV ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:»X6žijddi%> PxPlComV1 ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+A:»X6š%> ATTRCONT ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+A+Der2+Der/at+Adv:»X6žit K ;
 :%> EABBUCASE1 ;
 :%> EABBUCASE2 ;
 +Der2+Der/at+Adv:%>X8t K ;
 +Der2+Der/at+Adv+Err/Orth:%>X7t K ;
 +Der2+Der/at+Adv+Err/Orth:%>t K ;
 +Err/Orth: ATTR  ;

LEXICON EABBUCASE1 !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Sg+Nom:X1 K ; ! 
 +Sg+Nom:X7 K ; ! 
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Marg+Err/Orth: PxV ;
 +Ess:X1n K ;
 +Ess+Use/NG:X7n K ;
 +Ess+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X1n%> PxC ;
 +Ess+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X7n%> PxC ;
