src/morphology/stems/adjectives-L2.lexc
LEXICON Adjective
friddja+A+Err/Sub:friddjas EABBO/EAMOS ;
friija+A+Err/Sub:friijas EABBO/EAMOS ;
gaskaleabbo+A:gaskal EABBO/EAMOS ;
